Rhode Island, session 2025, SB969.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-64. Gas and electric utility customer bills.
(a) Each electric distribution company as defined by § 39-1-2(a) and each gas distribution
company included as a public utility as defined in § 39-1-2(a) shall provide a copy of the form,
content, and design of proposed bills to be sent to customers.
(b) The commission shall have the authority at any time to review the form, content, and
design of electric and/or gas bills used by any gas or electric utility for billing customers and require
any modifications that the commission finds:
(1) Are in the public interest; or
(2) Would in the commission’s discretion be beneficial for the advancement of any
significant energy or environmental policy initiatives in law or regulatory policy determined by the
commission.
(c) If any modification(s) ordered by the commission pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (b) of this section should require significant billing system changes, the commission
shall provide a reasonable amount of time for the gas or electric utility to make the required
modifications.
(d) To the extent that a gas or electric utility makes material changes to the form, content,
or design of the bills sent to customers, the gas or electric utility shall file a copy of the new bill

with the commission with a complete explanation of the changes. The filing is not required to be
made prior to implementation, but shall be made no later than sixty (60) days after any material
change has been put into effect for billing. The commission shall open a docket to receive public
comment and, if necessary, hold hearings to review the change.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000259
========
LC000259 - Page 2 of 3